Wisconsin, session 2025, SB630.
do enact as follows:SB630,11Section 1. 440.52 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB630,2,22440.52 (4) School revenue source. (a) In this subsection:SB630,2,531. “Annual revenue" means a school’s revenue generated during the school’s 4fiscal year that may be included in a school’s calculation related to compliance with 520 USC 1094 (a) (24).SB630,2,762. “Federal funds" means federal education assistance funds, as referenced in 720 USC 1094 (a) (24) and calculated in accordance with 20 USC 1094 (d) (1).SB630,2,108(b) A school may not enroll residents of this state if less than 20 percent of the 9school’s annual revenue is derived from a source other than federal funds in 2 of 3 of 10the school’s immediately preceding fiscal years.SB630,2,1111(c) The department shall promulgate rules to administer this subsection.SB630,212Section 2. Initial applicability.SB630,2,1313(1) This act first applies in the 2028-29 academic year.SB630,2,1414